nl: Type grillthermometer: Analoge wijzerplaat; Digitale bedrade sonde; Digitale draadloze sonde; Infrarood; Direct-uitleesbaar; Insteeksonde; Multisonde; Slimme app-verbinding; Opbouwmontage; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de termómetro para grelhador: Mostrador analógico; Sonda digital com fio; Sonda digital sem fio; Infravermelho; Leitura instantânea; Sonda de permanência; Sonda múltipla; Ligado a app inteligente; Montagem na superfície; Outro
es: Tipo de termómetro para parrilla: Analógico; Sensor digital con cable; Sensor inalámbrico digital; Infrarrojo; Lectura instantánea; Sensor sin enjuague; Sensor múltiple; Conectado a una aplicación inteligente; Montaje en superficie; Otros
ru: Тип термометра для гриля: Аналоговый со стрелкой; Цифровой проводной зонд; Цифровой беспроводной зонд; Инфракрасный; Мгновенное считывание; Стационарный зонд; Многозондовый; С подключением к приложению; Накладной; Другой
zh-CN: 烧烤温度计类型: 指针表盘; 数字有线探针; 数字无线探针; 红外; 即时读数; 置入式探针; 多探针; 智能应用程序连接; 表面安装; 其他
zh-TW: 烤肉溫度計類型: 指針式; 數位有線探針; 數位無線探針; 紅外線; 瞬時讀取; 留置探針; 多探針; 連接智慧型手機應用程式; 表面貼裝; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta termometra za žar: Analogno klicno; Digitalna žična sonda; Digitalna brezžična sonda; Infrardeča; Takojšnje branje; Sonda za izpiranje; Več sond; Pametna aplikacija, povezana; Površinska montaža; Druga
fi: Grillilämpömittarin tyyppi: Analoginen modeemi; Digitaalinen langallinen anturi; Digitaalinen langaton anturi; Infrapuna; Pikaluettava; Sisäänjätettävä anturi; Monianturi; Älykäs liitetty sovellus; Pinta-asennus; Muu
ko: 그릴 온도계 유형: 아날로그 다이얼; 디지털 유선 프로브; 디지털 무선 프로브; 적외선; 즉시 판독; 탐침 프로브; 멀티 프로브; 스마트 앱 연결; 표면 장착; 기타
sv: Typ av grilltermometer: analog visare; Digital trådbunden prob; Digital trådlös prob; Infraröd; Direktläsning; Lämna in sond; Multiprob; Smart app-ansluten; Ytmontering; Övrigt
hu: Grillhőmérő típusa: Analóg tárcsa; Digitális vezetékes szonda; Digitális vezeték nélküli szonda; Infravörös; Azonnal leolvasható; Behelyezhető szonda; Többszondás; Okos alkalmazáshoz csatlakoztatva; Felületi rögzítés; Egyéb
th: ประเภทของเทอร์โมมิเตอร์สำหรับย่าง: ไดอัลอนาล็อก; ดิจิทัลแบบโพรบมีสาย; ดิจิทัลแบบโพรบไร้สาย; อินฟราเรด; แบบอ่านค่าได้ทันที; แบบโพรบเสียบค้างได้; แบบหลายโพรบ; แบบเชื่อมต่อแอปอัจฉริยะ; ติดตั้งบนพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ termometru do grilla: Analogowe z pokrętłem; Cyfrowy z przewodową sondą; Cyfrowy bezprzewodowy; Podczerwień; Natychmiastowy odczyt; Z sondą stałą; Wielosondowy; Smart (z aplikacją); Nawierzchniowe; Pozostałe
ro-RO: Tip termometru de grătar: Cu cadran analogic; Sondă digitală cu fir; Sondă digitală fără fir; Cu infraroșu; Citire instantanee; Sondă de lăsat înăuntru; Sondă multiplă; Conectat la aplicație smart; Montare pe suprafață; Altele
nb: Grilltermometertype: Analog skive; Digital kablet sonde; Digital trådløs sonde; Infrarød; Øyeblikkelig lesing; Leave-in-sonde; Multiprobe; Smart app-tilkoblet; Overflatemontering; Annet
el: Τύπος θερμομέτρου ψησταριάς: Αναλογικός δείκτης; Ψηφιακός ενσύρματος αισθητήρας; Ψηφιακός ασύρματος αισθητήρας; Υπέρυθρες; Άμεσης ανάγνωσης; Αισθητήρας που παραμένει μέσα; Πολλαπλός αισθητήρας; Έξυπνη σύνδεση με εφαρμογή; Επιφανειακή βάση; Άλλο
vi: Loại nhiệt kế nướng: Quay số analog; Que đo nhiệt độ có dây kỹ thuật số; Que đo nhiệt độ không dây kỹ thuật số; Hồng ngoại; Đọc kết quả tức thì; Que đo nhiệt độ đặt cố định trong lò; Đa đầu dò; Kết nối ứng dụng thông minh; Gắn bề mặt; Khác
de: Grillthermometer-Typ: Analoge Skala; Digitale kabelgebundene Sonde; Digitale drahtlose Sonde; Infrarot; Sofort ablesbar; Fernüberwachung; Mehrfachsonde; Intelligente App-Verbindung; Oberflächenmontage; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di termometro per griglia: Quadrante analogico; Sonda digitale cablata; Sonda digitale wireless; Infrarossi; Lettura istantanea; Sonda a permanenza; Multi-sonda; App intelligente - connessa; Montaggio superficiale; Altro
tr: Izgara termometresi tipi: Analog çevirme; Dijital kablolu prob; Dijital kablosuz prob; Kızılötesi; Anında okumalı; Sürekli takılı prob; Çoklu prob; Akıllı uygulama bağlantılı; Yüzeye montaj; Diğer
fr: Type de thermomètre de barbecue: Cadran analogique; Sonde filaire numérique; Sonde sans fil numérique; Infrarouge; Lecture instantanée; Sonde à laisser en place; Multi-sondes; Connecté à l’application intelligente; Installation en surface; Autre
bg-BG: Тип термометър за грил: Аналогов циферблат; Цифрова кабелна сонда; Безжична цифрова сонда; Инфрачервено; Моментално отчитане; Сонда за постоянно поставяне; Мултисонда; Свързано със смарт приложениеложение; Повърхностен монтаж; Друго
ja: グリル温度計タイプ: アナログダイヤル; デジタル有線プローブ; デジタルワイヤレスプローブ; 赤外線; インスタントリード; リーブインプローブ; マルチプローブ; スマートアプリ接続; 表面実装; その他
en: Grill thermometer type: Analog dial; Digital wired probe; Digital wireless probe; Infrared; Instant-read; Leave-in probe; Multi-probe; Smart app-connected; Surface mount; Other
cs: Typ teploměru pro gril: Analogové s ciferníkem; Digitální vpichovací s kabelem; Digitální bezdrátové vpichovací; Infračervené; Okamžité čtení; Vpichovací ponechávaný v pokrmu; Vícesondový; Propojený s aplikací; Povrchové; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta termometra za roštilj: Analogni brojčanik; Digitalna žičana sonda; Digitalna bežična sonda; Infracrveno; Instant očitavanje; Sonda za stalno mjerenje; Višestruka sonda; Pametno povezano s aplikacijom; Montaža na površinu; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kepsninės termometro tipas: Analoginis ciferblatas; Skaitmeninis laidinis zondas; Skaitmeninis belaidis zondas; Infraraudonieji spinduliai; Momentinis skaitymas; Paliekamas zondas; Daugiafunkcis zondas; Išmanioji programėlė prijungta; Montuojamas paviršiuje; Kita
sk-SK: Typ teplomera na gril: Analógové nastavenie; Digitálny káblový sonda; Digitálna bezdrôtová sonda; Infračervený; S okamžitým meraním; Ihlový teplomer na pečenie; Teplomer s viacerými sondami; Pripojenie k inteligentnej aplikácii; Povrchová montáž; Iné
da: Grilltermometertype: Analog drejeknap; Digital kablet føler; Digital trådløs føler; Infrarød; Øjeblikkelig læsning; Leave-in-føler; Multifunktionel føler; Smart app-forbundet; Overflademontering; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de termômetro de grelha: Discagem analógica; Sonda digital com fio; Sonda digital sem fio; Infravermelho; Leitura instantânea; sonda de permanência; Sonda múltipla; Conexão via app; Suporte de superfície; Outro